District of Columbia statutes.
32-218

Street-trades badges — Contents; record to be kept; badges not transferable.

Such badge shall bear a number, and every such badge on its reverse side shall be signed in the presence of the officer issuing the same by the minor in whose name it is issued and shall contain the minor’s name, address and date of birth and such other information as the officer issuing the same shall deem necessary. A complete record of badges issued and refused, and of the facts relating thereto, including the name and address of the parent, guardian, or custodian, the day, year, and month of birth of the minor, the date of issuance and kind of evidence of age accepted, and school grade and name of school attended, shall be kept by the Board of Education. No minor to whom such badge is issued shall give, lend, sell, or otherwise transfer it to any other person, or be engaged in any of the trades or occupations mentioned in § 32-215 without wearing such badge, and such minor shall exhibit the same upon demand to any police or attendance officer, or to any person charged with the duty of enforcing this subchapter.

History

May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 1004, ch. 908, § 21
renumbered as § 18 and amended June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-68, § 2(22), 23 DCR 524

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-518.
1973 Ed., § 36-221.